Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 446A.073, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Regional projects. new text end new text begin If multiple governmental units are engaging in a joint project, the authority must consider, for purposes of ranking on the Pollution Control Agency's project priority list, where each governmental unit in the joint project would rank and place the total project at the position of the highest-ranking governmental unit. new text end